Alaska statutes. Title 25. Marital and Domestic Relations.
Article 7. General Provisions.

Sec. 25.05.381.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“bureau” means the Bureau of Vital Statistics;

“department” means the Department of Health and Social Services;

“licensing officer” means the registrar or a local registrar;

“local registrar” means a person appointed by the state registrar under AS

18.50.080

;

“registrar” means the state registrar of vital statistics.

History.

(§ 1 ch 58 SLA 1963; am § 3 ch 24 SLA 1966; am § 6 ch 104 SLA 1971; am §§ 11, 12 ch 79 SLA 1997)

Revisor’s notes. —

Reorganized in 1983 to alphabetize the defined terms. Paragraph (4) was enacted as (5). Renumbered in 1997, at which time former paragraph (4) was renumbered as (5).

Sec. 25.05.391.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Alaska Marriage Code.

History.

(§ 1 ch 58 SLA 1963)